Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Department  of Agriculture, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
services ..................................... $ 2,371,317
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 9,525,461
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 9,036,100
(4) Market access ........................... $ 3,374,998
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,  and in-
cluding federal funds for contract  services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received by the  State Department of Agriculture, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
services ..................................... $ 10,528,380
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 28,366,219
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 18,296,913
(4) Market access ........................... $ 17,162,536
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$10,636,822 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery  moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources
Fund to the  State Department of Agriculture for the Oregon Plan, to be used for activities
and projects to implement Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2019 Act col-
lected or received by the State Department of Agriculture, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative and support
services ..................................... $ 188,371
Enrolled House Bill 5002 (HB 5002-A) Page 1
(2) Food safety ............................... $ 1,500,711
(3) Natural resources ..................... $ 8,101,186
(4) Market access ........................... $ 7,734,379
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House May 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5002 (HB 5002-A) Page 2